Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 62. Criminal Justice Information and Records Checks.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS 12.62, and regulations adopted under authority of that chapter, do not apply to the Alaska Public Safety Information Network (APSIN) since APSIN was not “funded in whole or in part by the Law Enforcement Assistance Administration” and is, thus, not a “criminal justice information system” as that term was defined in former AS 12.62.070(3) [see AS

12.62.900

(13)], but restrictions on the system should nonetheless be imposed. December 10, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.